Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5348.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 23-6.3-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-6.3 entitled "Prevention
and Suppression of Contagious Diseases — HIV/AIDS" is hereby amended to read as follows:
23-6.3-4. Exceptions to consent requirements.
(a) A healthcare provider may test for the presence of HIV without obtaining consent from
the individual to be tested under the following conditions:
(1) When the individual to be tested is under one year of age;
(2) When a child between one and thirteen (13) years of age appears to be symptomatic for
HIV;
(3) When the individual to be tested is a minor under the care and authority of the
department of children, youth and families, and the director of that department certifies that an HIV
test is necessary to secure health or human services for that individual;
(4) In a licensed healthcare facility or healthcare setting, in the event that an occupational
health representative or physician, registered nurse practitioner, physician assistant, or nurse-
midwife, not directly involved in the exposure, determines that an employee or emergency service
worker, other than one in a supervisory position to the person making the determination, had a
significant exposure to the blood and/or body fluids of a patient and the patient or the patient’s
guardian refuses to grant consent for an HIV test to determine whether the patient has HIV, then,
if a sample of the patient’s blood is available, that blood shall be tested for HIV.

(i) If a sample of the patient’s blood is not otherwise available and the patient refuses to
grant consent to draw blood, the employee or emergency service worker may petition the superior
court for a court order mandating that the test be performed.
(ii) Before a patient or a sample of the patient’s blood is required to undergo an HIV test,
the employee or emergency service worker must submit to a baseline HIV test within seventy-two
(72) hours of the exposure.
(iii) No person who determines that an employee or emergency service worker has
sustained a significant exposure and authorizes the HIV testing of a patient, nor any person or
healthcare facility who acts in good faith and recommends the test be performed, shall have any
liability as a result of their actions carried out under this chapter, unless those persons are proven
to have acted in bad faith.
(iv) For the purposes of this section, “emergency service worker” means a worker
responding on behalf of a licensed ambulance/rescue service, or a fire department or a law
enforcement agency, who, in the course of his/her professional duties, has been exposed to bodily
fluids in circumstances that present a significant risk of transmission of HIV, and has completed a
pre-hospital exposure form in accordance with § 23-4.1-19.
(5) In an emergency, where due to a grave medical or psychiatric condition, and it is
impossible to obtain consent from the patient or, if applicable under state law, the patient’s parent,
guardian, or agent.
(6) As permitted under § 23-1-38 entitled “HIV Antibody Testing-Sperm Collection or
Donation.”
(7) Any individual convicted of a violation of any provisions of chapter 34.1 of title 11
entitled “Commercial Sexual Activity,” shall be required to be tested for HIV unless already
documented HIV positive. All individuals tested under this section shall be informed of their test
results. All individuals tested under this section who are determined to be injecting and/or intra-
nasal drug users shall be referred to appropriate substance abuse treatment as outlined in § 23-6.3-
3(e).
(8) Any individual convicted of possession of any controlled substance as defined in
chapter 28 of title 21 entitled “Uniform Controlled Substances Act,” that has been administered
with a hypodermic instrument, retractable hypodermic syringe, needle, intra-nasally, or any similar
instrument adapted for the administration of drugs shall be required to be tested for HIV unless
already documented HIV positive.
(9) All individuals tested under this section shall be informed of their test results.
(10) In accordance with the provisions of chapter 37 of title 11, entitled, “Sexual Assault,”
LC000439/SUB A - Page 2 of 5

any individual who has admitted to or been convicted of or adjudicated wayward or delinquent by
reason of having committed any sexual offense involving penetration whether or not a sentence or
fine is imposed or probation granted, shall be ordered by the court upon petition of the victim,
immediate family members of the victim or legal guardian of the victim, to submit to a blood test
for the presence of a sexually transmitted disease including, but not limited to, HIV. All individuals
tested under this section shall be informed of their test results.
(11) In accordance with the provisions or § 42-56-37, entitled “HIV Testing,” every
individual who is committed to the adult correctional institutions to any criminal offense, after
conviction, is required to be tested for HIV.
(b) It is unlawful for any person to disclose to a third party the results of an individual’s
HIV test without the prior written consent of that individual, except in accordance with § 23-6.3-7.
SECTION 2. Section 11-34.1-12 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-34.1 entitled
"Commercial Sexual Activity" is hereby amended to read as follows:
11-34.1-12. Human Immunodeficiency Virus (HIV).
(a) Any person convicted of a violation of any provisions of this chapter shall be required
provided the option to be tested for Human Immunodeficiency Virus (HIV). No consent for the
testing shall be required.
(b) The department of health shall maintain sites for providing both anonymous and
confidential HIV testing, and HIV counseling and referral. Each site, funded by the department of
health, shall offer free testing, counseling and referral for indigent parties and other individuals
without health insurance, offer a sliding scale for payment for all other individuals and, in the case
of confidential testing, screen for ability to pay through a third-party insurer. In the case of
nonfunded sites for HIV testing, organizations and/or institutions performing the test shall offer
free testing, counseling and referral for indigent parties and other individuals without health
insurance.
(c) All persons tested under this section shall be provided pre-test and post-test counseling
by individuals trained by the department of health, as an HIV testing counselor, in accordance with
regulations promulgated by the department of health; provided, that the counseling shall be in
accordance with acceptable medical standards.
(d) All persons who are tested under this section, who are determined to be injecting drug
users, shall be referred to appropriate sources of substance abuse treatment by the HIV testing
counselor and/or the attending practitioner as follows:
(1) Those persons who test positive for HIV infection shall be given priority for those
outpatient substance abuse treatment programs that are sponsored or supported by the appropriate
LC000439/SUB A - Page 3 of 5

state agency responsible for these services.
(2) Those persons who are injecting drug users and test negative for HIV infection shall be
referred, by the HIV testing counselor and/or attending practitioner, to the appropriate state agency
responsible for these services for earliest possible evaluation and treatment.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000439/SUB A
========
LC000439/SUB A - Page 4 of 5